Utah statutes.
11-36a-201.   Impact fees.

(1)  A local political subdivision or private entity shall ensure that any imposed impact fees comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)  A local political subdivision and private entity may establish impact fees only for those public facilities defined in Section 11-36a-102.

(3)  Nothing in this chapter may be construed to repeal or otherwise eliminate an impact fee in effect on the effective date of this chapter that is pledged as a source of revenues to pay bonded indebtedness that was incurred before the effective date of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

